Louisiana, session 2026, HB144.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:130.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§130.2. Obstruction of a legislative proceeding
A. The crime of obstruction of a legislative proceeding is any of the
following when committed with the knowledge that such act has, reasonably may,
or will affect an actual or potential present, past, or future legislative proceeding as
described in this Section:
(1) Impeding the due and proper administration of any legislative proceeding
or the due and proper exercise of the power of inquiry under which any inquiry or
investigation is conducted by either house of the legislature.
(2) Using or threatening force toward the person or property of a legislator
with the specific intent to do any of the following:
(a) Hinder, delay, or prevent the legislator from attending or participating in
a legislative proceeding.
(b) Influence the conduct of the legislator in a legislative proceeding.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-8 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 144
B.(1) Except as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, whoever
commits the crime of obstruction of a legislative proceeding shall be imprisoned for
not more than six months.
(2) Whoever commits the crime of obstruction of a legislative proceeding
that results in an injury that requires medical attention shall be imprisoned with or
without hard labor for not less than one year nor more than three years.
C. For the purposes of this Section, "legislative proceeding" means any of
the following:
(1) A committee or subcommittee meeting of either house of the legislature.
(2) A joint committee meeting of both houses of the legislature.
(3) The convening of either house of the legislature in its respective
chamber.
(4) Any other committee, board, or entity of which a legislator is a member.
Section 2. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 62(C) is hereby and amended and
reenacted and Code of Criminal Procedure Article 611(D)(3) is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 62. Authority of attorney general; supervision of district attorney
* * *
C. In any criminal action or proceeding involving a homicidal death or
obstruction of a legislative proceeding, if deemed necessary for the assertion or
protection of the rights and interests of the state, and in accordance with the
provisions of Article IV, Section 8 of the Constitution of Louisiana, the attorney
general may, with the consent of the district attorney, investigate, prosecute or
intervene in the action or proceeding.
* * *
Art. 611. Venue; trial where offense committed
* * *
D.
* * *
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-8 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 144
(3) If the offender is charged with the crime of obstruction of a legislative
proceeding, the offense is deemed to have been committed in any of the following:
(a) The parish of the underlying actual or potential present, past, or future
criminal proceeding or investigation.
(b) The parish where any act or element constituting the basis for the
obstruction of a legislative proceeding prosecution occurred.
(c) East Baton Rouge Parish.
* * *